apertium-kgp.kgp.lexc
LEXICON Interjections
he%<ij%>:he # ;
hẽ’%<ij%>:hẽ’ # ;
hỹ%<ij%>:hỹ # ;
kunĩg%<ij%>:kunĩg # ;
kuri%<ij%>:kuri # ;
kutĩg%<ij%>:kutĩg # ;
mẽ’%<ij%>:mẽ’ # ;
mũ% jé% ha%<ij%>:mũ% jé% ha # ;
nejé%<ij%>:nejé # ;
se%<ij%>:se # ;
té%<ij%>:té # ;
tón% ra%<ij%>:tón% ra # ;
vãrỹ%<ij%>:vãrỹ # ;
vó%<ij%>:vó # ;

!------------------------------------------------------------------------------

LEXICON Punctuation
.%<sent%>:. # ;
..%<sent%>:.. # ;
...%<sent%>:... # ;
%;%<sent%>:%; # ;
%:%<sent%>:%: # ;
%!%<sent%>:%! # ;
%-%<guio%>:%- # ;
%—%<guio%>:%— # ;
,%<cm%>:, # ;
%?%<sent%>:%? # ;
%'%<apos%>:%' # ;
%"%<sent%>:%" # ;
%«%<lquot%>:%« # ;
%»%<rquot%>:%» # ;
%”%<rquot%>:%” # ;
%“%<lquot%>:%“ # ;
%(%<lpar%>:%( # ;
%]%<rpar%>:%] # ;
%[%<lpar%>:%[ # ;
%)%<rpar%>:%) # ;
\%<sent%>:\ # ;
/%<sent%>:/ # ;

!-------------------------------------------------------------------------------

LEXICON Digits ! Use/Circ
%0:%0 NUM ;  ! Use/Circ
№:№ DIGITLEX ;  ! Use/Circ
DIGITLEX ; ! Use/Circ
LASTDIGIT ; ! Use/Circ
LASTDIGIT-REST ; ! Use/Circ

! Resources:
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Lexicon
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Lttoolbox_and_lexc
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Apertium-specific_conventions_for_lexc
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! https://github.com/hfst/
! http://www.cis.upenn.edu/~cis639/docs/lexc.html
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
